Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

General Provisions

4-31-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Local Development Authority Act.”

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-3101.

Cross-References. Bonds for construction of waterworks, see Waterworks under BONDS in the Index to Uncodified Public Chapters, Volume 16.

4-31-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agricultural development loan program” means the authority's program of providing loans to lenders or purchasing loans from lenders for the purpose of making funds available for the financing of agricultural enterprises;

“Agricultural enterprise” means the acquisition, reconstruction or improvement of land or buildings or other improvements thereto, or any combination thereof, and any breeding stock and machinery or equipment necessary or suitable for use in farming, ranching, the production of agricultural commodities, including the products of agriculture and silviculture, or necessary and suitable for treating, processing, storing or transporting raw agricultural commodities;

“Authority” means the Tennessee local development authority, a public agency and instrumentality of the state, created by this chapter, or if such authority shall be abolished, the board, body, commission or agency succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to which the powers and duties granted or imposed upon the authority shall be given by law;

“Bond” means any bond authorized and issued pursuant to this chapter;

“Capital project” means the same as “public works project” as defined in § 9-21-105;

“Department” means the department of environment and conservation, or, if the department shall be abolished, the board, body, commission or agency succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to which the powers and duties granted or imposed upon the department shall be given by law;

“Industrial development authority” means the Tennessee industrial development authority, or, if the industrial development authority shall be abolished, the board, body, commission or agency succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to which the powers and duties granted or imposed upon the industrial development authority shall be given by law;

“Lender” means any federal or state chartered bank, federal land bank, production credit association, bank for cooperatives, federal or state chartered savings and loan association or building and loan association, insurance company, or mortgage loan company;

“Loan insurer” or “loan guarantor” means an agency, department, administration or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of or in the department of housing and urban development, the farmers home administration of the department of agriculture or the veterans administration of the United States, any private mortgage insurance company or any other public or private agency that insures or guarantees loans;

“Loan program agreement” means a contractual arrangement by and between a local government unit and the authority pursuant to and in accordance with part 4 of this chapter providing for loans to such local government units for the purpose of paying the cost of the construction of capital projects and a contractual arrangement by and between a local government unit and the state acting by and through the department, pursuant to and in accordance with [former] title 68, chapter 211, part 4 [repealed], or title 68, chapter 221, parts 2 and 5 providing for loans to such local government unit for the purpose of paying the cost of the construction of sewage treatment works, waterworks, or energy recovery facilities and/or solid waste resource recovery facilities, as the case may be, which loans are made or are to be made from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued pursuant to this chapter;

“Local government unit” means any county, metropolitan government, incorporated town or city, or special district of the state, water/wastewater authority or any energy authority created by an act of the general assembly;

“Note” means any note authorized and issued pursuant to this chapter;

“Pollution” means the placing of any noxious or deleterious substances, including noise, in any air or water or land of or adjacent to the state or affecting the physical, chemical or biological properties of any air or waters or land of or adjacent to the state in a manner and to an extent that renders or is likely to render such air or waters or land inimical or harmful to the public health, safety or welfare, or to animal, bird or aquatic life, or to the use of such air or waters or land for domestic, industrial, agricultural or recreational purposes;

“Pollution control facilities” means any equipment, structure or facility or any land and any building, structure, facility or other improvement thereon, or any combination thereof, and all real and personal property deemed necessary therewith having to do with or the end purpose of which is the control, abatement or prevention of water, air, noise or general environmental pollution, including, but not limited to, any air pollution control facility, noise abatement facility, water management facility, waste water collecting system, waste water treatment works, or solid waste disposal facility;

“Program loans” means loans or grants made to a local government unit by the state that are required to be repaid pursuant to a loan program agreement;

“Small business concern” means an enterprise that constitutes a “small business concern” under federal law and the criteria used by the administrator of the small business administration of the United States as the same may be amended from time to time;

“Small business financing agreement” means a lease, sublease or loan agreement entered into between a small business concern and the authority, the payments under which have been guaranteed by the small business administration of the United States or any other agency thereof;

“State” means the state of Tennessee;

“State loan programs” means the activities and policies undertaken by the state pursuant to title 68, chapter 221, part 2 to provide assistance to local government units by making grants that are required to be repaid for the construction of sewage treatment works, or pursuant to title 68, chapter 221, part 5, to provide assistance to local government units by making loans for the construction of waterworks, or pursuant to [former] title 68, chapter 211, part 4 [repealed], to provide assistance to local government units by making loans for the construction of energy recovery facilities or solid waste resource recovery facilities, or both, or pursuant to part 4 of this chapter to provide assistance to local government units by making loans for the construction of capital projects; and

“State-shared taxes” means taxes imposed and collected by the state pursuant to law and allocated by law to local government units, whether allocated for a particular purpose or for the general use of such local government units.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-3102; Acts 1981, ch. 394, § 3; 1982, ch. 873, § 10; 1986, ch. 846, §§ 1-3; 1990, ch. 885, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 693, § 1; 2009, ch. 409, § 1; 2012, ch. 957, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 68, chapter 211, part 4 referred to in this section, concerning resource and energy recovery, was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 846, § 48, effective July 1, 1996.

Cross-References. Funding for rural fire protection equipment, title 4, chapter 31, part 5.

4-31-103. Authority created — Organization and administration.

There is hereby created a body, politic and corporate, to be known as the “Tennessee local development authority.”

The authority shall be a public agency and an instrumentality of the state and shall be deemed to be acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state in the performance of essential public functions and to be serving a public purpose in improving and otherwise promoting the health, welfare and prosperity of the people of the state.

Its membership shall consist of the governor, the secretary of state, the state treasurer, the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration, and their successors in office from time to time, by virtue of their incumbency in such offices and without further appointment or qualification, together with one (1) member who shall be appointed by the speaker of the senate from a list of three (3) individuals nominated by the Tennessee county services association, and one (1) member who shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives from a list of three (3) individuals nominated by the Tennessee municipal league, each of whom shall serve for a period of two (2) years, subject to reappointment, or until such member's successor is similarly nominated and appointed.

The governor, the secretary of state, the state treasurer, the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration shall be designated as ex officio members of the authority. Each ex officio member of the authority may designate a member of the ex officio member's respective staff to attend meetings of the authority or its committees and to exercise the ex officio member's right to vote in the ex officio member's absence. The designation must be made in writing addressed to the secretary of the authority specifying the meeting for which the designation is effective and filed with the secretary of state.

The member appointed by the speaker of the senate and the member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives shall not participate in or vote on any proceeding before the authority relative to the agricultural development loan program.

For purposes of administering the agricultural development loan program, the governor may appoint two (2) individuals knowledgeable in agricultural enterprise to serve as nonvoting advisors to the authority.

The recommendations of such advisors attending any meeting of the authority shall be part of the minutes.

Such advisors shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The governor shall serve as chair of the authority, and the comptroller of the treasury shall serve as secretary.

The members shall serve without salary, but each member shall be entitled to reimbursement for such member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of such member's official duties.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The authority and its corporate existence shall continue until terminated by law; provided, that no such law shall take effect so long as the authority shall have bonds, notes or other obligations outstanding.

Upon termination of the existence of the authority, all its rights and properties shall pass to and be vested in the state.

The powers of the authority shall be vested in and exercised by no fewer than four (4) of the members thereof.

The authority may delegate to one (1) or more of its members or its officers such powers and duties as it may deem proper.

Written minutes covering all meetings and actions of the authority shall be prepared by the secretary of the authority and shall be kept on file, open to public inspection.

The minutes and all other records of the authority shall be kept in the office of the comptroller of the treasury.

The authority shall be empowered to act on behalf of the state and its people in serving this public purpose for the benefit of the general public.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-3103; Acts 1981, ch. 394, § 4; 2009, ch. 113, § 1.

4-31-104. Powers.

Except as otherwise limited by this chapter, the authority has the power to:

Sue and be sued;

Have a seal and alter the same at pleasure;

Make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions under this chapter;

Subject to agreements with bondholders or noteholders, make rules and regulations governing the conduct of its meetings and the use and application of its money and properties;

Borrow money and issue negotiable bonds, notes or other obligations in the principal amounts and for the purposes authorized by law, and provide for the rights of the holders of such bonds, notes or other obligations;

Invest any funds held in reserve or sinking funds, or any moneys not required for immediate use or disbursement at the discretion of the authority in any investments or securities in which moneys of the state are authorized to be invested;

In connection with the issuance of bonds or notes of the authority, make and collect such rents, fees and charges, including, but not limited to, reimbursement of all costs of financing by the authority as the authority shall determine to be reasonable and required;

Accept any gifts or grants or loans of funds or financial or other aid in any form from the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof or from the state or from any other source and to comply, subject to this chapter, with the terms and conditions thereof;

Accept the assignment of the right to receive money paid under loan program agreements;

Engage the services of attorneys and consultants on a fee or contract basis for the rendering of professional and technical assistance and advice;

Do any and all things necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and exercise the powers expressly given and granted in this chapter;

Procure insurance or guarantees from any public or private entities, including any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States, for payment of any bonds or notes issued by the authority to fund its state loan programs and its agricultural development loan program, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance;

Enter into agreements with any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States or the state and with lenders, and enter into loan agreements, sales contracts and leases with contracting parties for the purpose of planning, regulating and providing for the financing or refinancing of any agricultural enterprise;

Enter into contracts or agreements with lenders for the servicing and processing of loans made to finance agricultural enterprises;

Provide technical assistance to local public bodies and to profit and nonprofit entities in the development or operation of agricultural enterprises and distribute data and information concerning the encouragement and improvement of agricultural enterprises and agricultural employment in the state;

To the extent permitted under a resolution authorizing notes or bonds to fund the agricultural development loan program, consent to any modification with respect to the rate of interest, time and payment of any installment of principal or interest, or any other term of any contract, loan, loan note, loan note commitment, contract, lease or agreement of any kind to which the authority is a party;

To the extent permitted under a resolution authorizing notes or bonds to fund the agricultural development loan program for financing certain agricultural enterprises, enter into contracts with any lender containing provisions enabling it to reduce the rental or carrying charges to persons unable to pay the regular schedule of charges when, by reason of other income or payment by any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States or of the state, the reduction can be made without jeopardizing the economic stability of the agricultural enterprise being financed;

Enter into agreements for management on behalf of the authority of any of its properties acquired under the agricultural development loan program upon such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreeable;

Sell, at public or private sale, with or without public bidding, any loan or other obligation held by the authority, when such loan or other obligation is held by the authority pursuant to the agricultural loan program;

Foreclose any mortgages, deeds of trust, notes, debentures, bonds and other security interests held by it relative to an agricultural enterprise either by action or by exercise of a power of sale, and sell the equity of redemption in such security interests in accordance with the terms of such instruments and applicable state law, and take all such other actions as may be necessary to enforce any obligation held by it;

Purchase the equity of redemption in any such mortgage, deed of trust, note, debenture, bond or other security interest;

Mortgage, pledge, assign or grant security interests in any or all of its notes or other instruments, contract rights or other property, including, but without limitation to, any receipts from insurance on or guarantees of any of its notes or other instruments or any receipts from state-shared taxes, as security for the payment of the principal of and interest on any notes or bonds issued by the authority, or as security for any agreements made in connection therewith, whether then owned or thereafter acquired;

Sell, exchange, donate and convey any or all of its properties whenever the authority shall find such action to be in furtherance of the purposes for which the authority was created;

Make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient to do any and all things, including the issuance of rules and regulations, for the exercise of its powers and functions under the Wastewater Facilities Act of 1987, compiled in title 68, chapter 221, part 10;

When entering into any contracts or agreements authorized under this chapter, including contracts or agreements providing for liquidity and credit enhancement and reimbursement agreements relating thereto, interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, other interest rate hedging agreements, evidencing a transaction bearing a reasonable relationship to this state and also to another state or nation, agree in the written contract or agreement that the rights and remedies of the parties thereto shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation; provided, however, that jurisdiction over the authority against which an action on such a contract or agreement is brought shall lie solely in a court located in Tennessee that would otherwise have jurisdiction of actions brought in contract against the authority; and

For purposes of financing the acquisitions and improvements of facilities previously financed under part 7 of this chapter and from funds available, lend moneys to local government units to be repaid with revenues of such facilities under such terms and conditions deemed appropriate by the authority.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-3104; Acts 1981, ch. 394, § 5; 1982, ch. 873, § 11; 1986, ch. 846, § 4; 1987, ch. 299, § 16; 2001, ch. 253, § 1; 2003, ch. 355, § 64.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Cross-References. Bonds for construction of waterworks, see Waterworks under BONDS in the Index to Uncodified Public Chapters, Volume 16.

Duties concerning construction of sewage treatment works, title 68, ch. 221, part 2.

Duties concerning waterworks construction loans, title 68, ch. 221, part 5.

4-31-105. Bonds and notes — Issuance and terms — Designation of state-shared taxes.

Whenever the authority is authorized by law to issue bonds or notes, the bonds and notes shall be authorized by resolution of the authority, may be in one (1) or more series, shall bear such date or dates, and shall mature at such time or times, in the case of any such note or any renewals thereof, not exceeding eight (8) years from the date of issue of such original note, and in the case of any such bond not exceeding thirty (30) years from the date of issue, as such resolution or resolutions may provide.

In its discretion, the authority by resolution may provide that a note or any renewal of such note may mature more than eight (8) years from the date of issue of such original note; provided, that:

The local government units whose projects were financed pursuant to loan program agreements with the proceeds of such note or renewal note shall have begun repayment of principal in accordance with a payment schedule established by the authority; and

The maturity of such note or any renewal note or bond refunding such notes financing such program agreements shall not exceed thirty (30) years from the date of issue of such original note.

The bonds and notes shall bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption, as such resolution or resolutions may provide.

The bonds and notes may be sold at public or private sale, at such price or prices as the authority shall determine.

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of bonds or notes issued or anticipated to be issued hereunder, the authority may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements and options in respect thereto, from time to time and under such terms and conditions as the authority may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the authority to pay to or receive from any person or entity for any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default under such agreement.

The authority may enter into an agreement to sell its bonds or notes under this chapter, providing for delivery of such debt not more than five (5) years, or such greater period of time if approved by the comptroller of the treasury, from the date of execution of such agreement or in the case of refunding bonds the earlier of the first date on which the bonds being refunded can be optionally redeemed resulting in cost savings or be optionally redeemed at par.

Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any bonds or notes, or any series thereof, may contain the following provisions, which shall be a part of the contract with the holders thereof:

Pledging all or any part of the moneys that the authority is permitted by law to pledge, and securing the payment of the bonds or notes or of any series thereof, subject to such agreements with bondholders or noteholders as may then exist;

Creating and establishing such funds and accounts as may be deemed necessary or advisable and setting aside reserves or sinking funds and agreeing as to the maintenance, regulation and disposition thereof;

Limiting the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of bonds or notes may be applied, and pledging such proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds or notes or of any series thereof;

Limiting the issuance of additional bonds or notes, the terms upon which additional bonds or notes may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding or other bonds or notes;

Prescribing the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders or noteholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds or notes the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

Investing in a trustee or trustees such property, rights, powers and duties in trust as the authority may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers and duties of the trustee appointed by the bondholders pursuant to § 4-31-106 and limiting or abrogating the right of the bondholders to appoint a trustee or limiting the rights, powers and duties of such trustee; or

Setting forth any other matters, of like or different character, that in any way affect the security or protection of the bonds or notes.

The authority by resolution may, from time to time, identify those taxes constituting state-shared taxes and, upon approval of the form and substance of such resolution by the attorney general and reporter, such identification shall be conclusive as to those taxes that constitute state-shared taxes; provided, that nothing contained in this subsection (c) shall be deemed to require the general assembly to continue to impose any tax identified as a state-shared tax or to maintain such tax at any particular level.

As of January 1, 1986, the identification by the authority of the following taxes as state-shared taxes is hereby ratified and confirmed:

The tax on income from stocks and bonds, distributed pursuant to title 67, chapter 2;

The gasoline tax, distributed pursuant to title 67, chapter 3;

The motor vehicle fuel use tax, distributed pursuant to title 67, chapter 3, part 8 [repealed];

The sales tax, distributed pursuant to title 67, chapter 6;

The mixed drink tax, distributed pursuant to title 57, chapter 4;

The alcoholic beverage tax, distributed pursuant to title 57, chapter 3;

The beer tax, distributed pursuant to title 57, chapter 5; and

The federal payments in lieu of taxes, distributed pursuant to title 67, chapter 9.

A local government unit shall not have any claim on state-shared taxes withheld as permitted under the terms of the state loan program.

The authority, subject to such agreements with bondholders or noteholders as may then exist, shall have power to purchase notes or bonds out of any moneys available therefor at a price not exceeding:

The redemption price then applicable, plus accrued interest to the next interest payment date thereon, if the notes or bonds are then redeemable; or

The redemption price applicable on the first date after such purchase upon which the bonds or notes become subject to redemption, plus accrued interest to such date if the notes or bonds are not then redeemable.

All bonds and notes so purchased shall be cancelled.

Neither the members of the authority nor any person executing the bonds or notes shall be liable personally on the bonds or notes or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

In the event any member of the authority whose signature or facsimile signature thereof shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be a member of the authority before the delivery thereof, such signature or facsimile signature nevertheless shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such member had remained a member of the authority until after such delivery.

Any pledge made by the authority pursuant to this chapter or by a local government unit pursuant to a loan program agreement shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made, the moneys or property so pledged and thereafter received by the authority or local government unit, as applicable, shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the authority or local government unit, as applicable, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.

Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

The bonds and notes shall not be invalid for any irregularity or defect in the proceedings for the issuance or sale thereof.

Such bonds and notes shall contain a recital that they have been authorized and issued pursuant to the laws of the state, including particularly this chapter, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and the regularity of their issuance.

Bonds and notes of the authority shall not constitute a debt or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or any local government unit, and the holders or owners of such bonds and notes shall have no right to have taxes levied by the general assembly or any local government unit or any other taxing authority within the state for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, such bonds and notes, but such bonds and notes shall be payable solely from the revenues and moneys pledged for their payment.

All such bonds and notes shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the bonds or notes are not a debt of the state or any local government unit or any other taxing authority within the state, but are payable solely from revenues and moneys pledged to the payment thereof.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 5; T.C.A., § 4-3105; Acts 1982, ch. 873, § 12; 1986, ch. 846, §§ 5, 6; 1989, ch. 233, § 1; 1990, ch. 885, § 3; 2001, ch. 253, § 2; 2003, ch. 298, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Title 67, ch. 3, part 8, referred to in this section, was repealed by Act 1997, ch. 316, § 1. For new provisions concerning the petroleum product tax, see title 67, ch. 3, parts 1-14.

Cross-References. Bonds for construction of waterworks, see Waterworks under BONDS in the Index to Uncodified Public Chapters, Volume 16.

Funding for rural fire protection equipment, title 4, ch. 31, part 5.

4-31-106. Bonds and notes — Default — Remedies.

In the event that the authority shall default in the payment of principal of or interest and premium, if any, on bonds or notes similarly secured after the same shall become due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and such default shall continue for a period of thirty (30) days, or in the event that the authority shall fail or refuse to comply with this chapter, or shall default in any agreement made with the holders of bonds or notes similarly secured, the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) in aggregate principal amount of such bonds and notes then outstanding, by instrument or instruments filed in the office of the comptroller of the treasury and approved or acknowledged in the same manner as a deed to be recorded, may appoint a trustee to represent the holders of such notes or bonds for the purposes herein provided in this section.

Such trustee may, and upon written request of the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) in principal amount of such bonds and notes then outstanding shall, in such trustee's own name:

By suit, action or proceeding at law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction, enforce all rights of the bondholders or noteholders, including the right to require the authority to collect the moneys payable to it and to require the authority to carry out any other agreements with the holders of such bonds or notes and to perform its duties under this chapter;

Bring suit upon such bonds or notes;

By action or suit, require the authority to account as if it were the trustee of an express trust for the holders of such bonds and notes;

By action or suit, enjoin any acts or things that may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holders of such bonds or notes; and

Declare all such bonds or notes due and payable and, if all defaults shall be made good, then, with the consent of the holders of the twenty-five percent (25%) of the principal amount of such bonds or notes then outstanding, to annul such declaration and its consequences.

Such trustee shall, in addition to the foregoing, have and possess all of the powers necessary or appropriate for the exercise of any functions specially set forth herein or incident to the general representation of bondholders or noteholders in the enforcement and protection of their rights.

Notwithstanding the preceding provisions of this section, the authority may provide in resolution or resolutions authorizing such bonds and notes for the limitation or abrogation of the rights of a trustee if the particular default shall have been remedied or cured or proper action is diligently being pursued by the authority, to remedy or cure default.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 6; T.C.A., § 4-3106.

4-31-107. Bonds and notes — Issuance to fund state loan programs.

For the purpose of providing moneys to make program loans under the state loan programs or to retire general obligation bond anticipation notes of the state issued to provide interim financing for such program loans the authority, in addition to the powers otherwise granted by law, shall have the power and is hereby authorized to issue from time to time negotiable bonds and notes of the authority in such principal amounts as may from time to time be authorized by law.

The proceeds of such bonds and notes shall be applied by the authority, as it deems necessary, to provide sufficient moneys to carry out the purposes of the state loan programs, including the retirement of general obligation bond anticipation notes of the state issued to provide interim financing for the state loan programs, to provide for the payment of interest on such bonds and notes for a reasonable time after issuance, to establish reserves to secure such bonds and notes, and to provide for the payment of costs incident to the issuance of such bonds and notes.

Bonds or notes issued by the authority to provide for loans to local government units pursuant to title 68, chapter 221, part 2 for the construction of sewage treatment works, pursuant to title 68, chapter 221, part 5 for the construction of water works, or pursuant to [former] title 68, chapter 211, part 4 [repealed], for the construction of energy recovery facilities and/or solid waste resource recovery facilities shall not be issued and sold as part of an issue of bonds or notes of the authority issued pursuant to part 4 of this chapter to provide for loans to local government units for the construction of capital projects, or with bonds or notes issued pursuant to any other provisions of this chapter or any other law, nor shall bonds or notes issued by the authority pursuant to part 4 of this chapter to provide loans to local government units for the construction of capital projects be issued and sold as part of an issue of bonds or notes issued pursuant to any other provision of this chapter or any other law; provided, that the foregoing shall not prohibit the issuance of separate issues of bonds or notes pursuant to this section.

The authority has the power, and is hereby authorized, to issue from time to time renewal notes, and bonds to pay notes issued in anticipation of such bonds, and, whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of refunding bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and to issue bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any other authorized purpose.

Such refunding bonds and renewal notes may be issued without further authorization, such issuance being deemed authorized by the law authorizing the bonds and notes to be renewed, paid or refunded.

The refunding bonds shall be sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption or payment of the bonds to be refunded.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the authority, each issue of its notes or bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be limited special obligations of the authority payable solely from and secured solely by moneys derived by the authority from all or a portion of payments made by local government units, pursuant to the loan program agreements with such local government units or moneys withheld from state-shared taxes apportioned to such local government units as permitted under the state loan programs, as provided in the resolution authorizing such bonds and notes.

The authority is hereby authorized to issue its bonds and notes in such manner as provided by this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 785, § 7; T.C.A., § 4-3107; Acts 1982, ch. 873, § 13; 1984, ch. 965, § 1; 1986, ch. 846, §§ 7-11; 1989, ch. 233, §§ 2, 3; 1990, ch. 885, §§ 4, 5; 2003, ch. 298, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Title 68, chapter 211, part 4, referred to in this section and concerning resource and energy recovery, was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 846, § 48, effective July 1, 1996.

Cross-References. Funding for rural fire protection equipment, title 4, ch. 31, part 5.